apertium-id-ms.ms.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <!-- POS categories -->
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="mod"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="part"/>
    
    <!-- Gender -->
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>

    <!-- Number -->
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="card"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="coll"/>
    
    <!-- Person -->
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    
    <!-- Adj -->
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    
    <!-- Case -->
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    
    <!-- Voice -->
    <sdef n="actv"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"/>
    
    <!-- Affixes -->
    <sdef n="ber-an"/>
    <sdef n="ber-kan"/>
    <sdef n="ber"/>
    <sdef n="kan"/>
    <sdef n="ke-an"/>
    <sdef n="ke"/>
    <sdef n="pe-an"/>
    <sdef n="pe"/>
    <sdef n="peN-an"/>
    <sdef n="peN"/>
    <sdef n="per-an"/>
    <sdef n="per-i"/>
    <sdef n="per-kan"/>
    <sdef n="per"/>
    <sdef n="san"/>
    <sdef n="se"/>
    <sdef n="si"/>
    <sdef n="ter"/>

    <sdef n="kah"/>
    <sdef n="pun"/>
    <sdef n="nya"/>
    
    <!-- Reduplication -->
    <sdef n="red"/>
    
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="enc"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="subst"/>
    <sdef n="actio"/>
    <sdef n="attr"/>
    
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar"/> 
    <sdef n="lquest"/> 
    <sdef n="apos"/> 
    <sdef n="percent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-</l>
        <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="coma">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>,</l>
        <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="aposchar">
    <e>
        <i>'</i>
    </e>
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>’</l>
        <r>'</r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="cometa">
    <e>
        <par n="aposchar"/> 
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="apos"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="numeros">
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separa">
    <e>
      <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="sent"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="separ">
    <e>
      <re>[¿¡]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="paresq">
    <e>
      <re>[\(\[]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="pardret">
    <e>
      <re>[\)\]]</re>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="baik__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbanyak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbaiki__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbaikinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbanyakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbanyakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbanyaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacak-acak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacak-acakkan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacak-acakkannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mengacak-acaknya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menghormat-hormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menghormat-hormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="red"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menghormati__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="menghormatinya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="si"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbahagia__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkekalan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkekalannya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber-an"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berkeadilan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="ke-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berbahagianya__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="berpenerangan__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="ber"/><s n="peN-an"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diacak__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="elektronis"><i>elektronis</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="konvergen"><i>konvergen</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="palsu"><i>palsu</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sosial"><i>sosial</i><par n="baik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hormat"><p><l>berhormat</l><r>hormat</r></p><par n="berbahagia__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lanjut"><p><l>berlanjut</l><r>lanjut</r></p><par n="berbahagia__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>bertahan</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="berbahagia__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sama"><p><l>bersamanya</l><r>sama</r></p><par n="berbahagianya__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="layak"><p><l>berkelayakan</l><r>layak</r></p><par n="berkeadilan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mampu"><p><l>berkemampuan</l><r>mampu</r></p><par n="berkeadilan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penting"><p><l>berkepentingan</l><r>penting</r></p><par n="berkeadilan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kekal"><p><l>berkekalan</l><r>kekal</r></p><par n="berkekalan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lanjut"><p><l>berlanjutan</l><r>lanjut</r></p><par n="berkekalan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tepat"><p><l>bertepatan</l><r>tepat</r></p><par n="berkekalan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baik"><p><l>memperbaiki</l><r>baik</r></p><par n="memperbaiki__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cepat"><p><l>mempercepat</l><r>cepat</r></p><par n="memperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dalam"><p><l>memperdalam</l><r>dalam</r></p><par n="memperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kaya"><p><l>memperkaya</l><r>kaya</r></p><par n="memperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="panjang"><p><l>memperpanjang</l><r>panjang</r></p><par n="memperbanyak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="malu"><p><l>mempermalukan</l><r>malu</r></p><par n="memperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>mempertahankan</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="memperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="timbang"><p><l>mempertimbangkan</l><r>timbang</r></p><par n="memperbanyakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dalam"><p><l>mendalam</l><r>dalam</r></p><par n="mengacak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="laju"><p><l>melaju</l><r>laju</r></p><par n="mengacak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="masak"><p><l>memasak</l><r>masak</r></p><par n="mengacak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="samar"><p><l>menyamar</l><r>samar</r></p><par n="mengacak__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="betul"><p><l>membetulkan</l><r>betul</r></p><par n="mengacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kecewa"><p><l>mengecewakan</l><r>kecewa</r></p><par n="mengacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="panas"><p><l>memanaskan</l><r>panas</r></p><par n="mengacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tegang"><p><l>menegangkan</l><r>tegang</r></p><par n="mengacakkan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bebas"><p><l>membebaskannya</l><r>bebas</r></p><par n="mengacakkannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="benar"><p><l>membenarkannya</l><r>benar</r></p><par n="mengacakkannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="galak"><p><l>menggalakkannya</l><r>galak</r></p><par n="mengacakkannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="raya"><p><l>merayakannya</l><r>raya</r></p><par n="mengacakkannya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="benci"><p><l>membencinya</l><r>benci</r></p><par n="mengacaknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="luas"><p><l>meluasnya</l><r>luas</r></p><par n="mengacaknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>menahannya</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="mengacaknya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>mendekati</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="menghormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="jauh"><p><l>menjauhi</l><r>jauh</r></p><par n="menghormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="patuh"><p><l>mematuhi</l><r>patuh</r></p><par n="menghormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tepat"><p><l>menepati</l><r>tepat</r></p><par n="menghormati__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cinta"><p><l>mencintainya</l><r>cinta</r></p><par n="menghormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>mendekatinya</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="menghormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="hormat"><p><l>menghormatinya</l><r>hormat</r></p><par n="menghormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="suka"><p><l>menyukainya</l><r>suka</r></p><par n="menghormatinya__adj"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="separ"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
